District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-115.14

Rulemaking.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 15, 43 DCR 6854
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-997.14.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of the Multiple Dwelling Residence Water Lead Level Test Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-483, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7833).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Multiple Dwelling Residence Water Lead Level Test Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-560, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10382).